Utah statutes.
31A-23a-413.   Title insurance producer's annual report.

An agency title insurance producer and an individual title insurance producer who has not been designated by an agency title insurance producer shall annually file with the commissioner, by a date and in a form the commissioner specifies by rule, a verified statement of the agency title insurance producer's or individual title insurance producer's financial condition, transactions, and affairs as of the end of the preceding calendar year.



Amended by Chapter 319, 2013 General Session

